California statutes. Public Contract Code
 before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board a good and sufficient bond, to be approved by the board, conditioned upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bond shall contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and be subject to the provisions of that title. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise for new bids, or by a two-thirds vote may elect to undertake the work by force account.

(b) If no proposals are received pursuant to
 advertisement or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by employees of the district, by day labor, under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of those methods. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may acquire in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except that work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500), without
 advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 103.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 129. Colusa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21640. - 21641.]

21640.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Colusa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 926 of the Statutes of 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21641.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided, estimated to cost in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article.

(b) The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of the claims for labor and material. The board may reject any bid.

(c) If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or where the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States or to a contract authorized by a vote of the eligible voters of the district or a zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bidding on Public Contracts [22000. - 22045.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent and Definitions [22000. - 22003.]

22000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act.”

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21000 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1054) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

The Legislature finds and declares that there is a statewide need to promote uniformity of the cost accounting standards and bidding procedures on construction work performed or contracted by public entities in the state. This chapter provides for the development of cost accounting standards and an alternative method for the bidding of public works projects by public entities.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21001 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1054) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.5.

On or before January 1, 2009, the Controller shall send a notice to all public agencies describing the provisions of this chapter and the benefits of using its provisions. This notice shall also be included in any notification issued by the Controller pursuant to Section 22020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

(a) “Public agency,” for purposes of this chapter, means a city, county, city and county, including chartered cities and chartered counties, any special district, and any other agency of the state for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. “Public agency” also includes a nonprofit transit corporation wholly owned by a public agency and formed to carry out the purposes of the public agency.

(b) “Representatives of the construction industry” for purposes of this chapter, means a general contractor, subcontractor, or labor representative with experience in the field of public works construction.

(c) “Public
 project” means any of the following:

(1) Construction, reconstruction, erection, alteration, renovation, improvement, demolition, installation, and repair work involving any publicly owned, leased, or operated facility.

(2) Painting or repainting of any publicly owned, leased, or operated facility.

(3) In the case of a publicly owned electric utility system, “public project” shall include only the construction, erection, improvement, or repair of dams, reservoirs, powerplants, and electrical transmission lines of 230,000 volts and higher.

(d) “Public project” does not include maintenance work. For purposes of this section, “maintenance work” includes all of the following:

(1) Routine,
 recurring, and usual work for the preservation or protection of any publicly owned or publicly operated facility for its intended purposes.

(2) Minor repainting.

(3) Resurfacing of streets and highways at less than one inch.

(4) Landscape maintenance, including mowing, watering, trimming, pruning, planting, replacement of plants, and servicing of irrigation and sprinkler systems.

(5) Work performed to keep, operate, and maintain publicly owned water, power, or waste disposal systems, including, but not limited to, dams, reservoirs, powerplants, and electrical transmission lines of 230,000 volts and higher.

(e) For purposes of this chapter, “facility” means any plant, building, structure,
 ground facility, utility system, subject to the limitation found in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), real property, streets and highways, or other public work improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 1.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

A public agency which has, by resolution, elected to become subject to the uniform construction cost accounting procedures set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 22010), may utilize the bidding procedures set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 22030) when contracting for “maintenance work,” as defined in Section 22002, or when contracting for any other work which does not fall within the definition of “public project,” as defined in Section 22002.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Uniform Construction Cost Accounting Commission [22010. - 22020.]

22010.

There is hereby created the California Uniform Construction Cost Accounting Commission. The commission is comprised of 14 members.

(a) Thirteen of the members shall be appointed by the Controller as follows:

(1) Two members who shall each have at least 10 years of experience with, or providing professional services to, a general contracting firm engaged, during that period, in public works construction in California.

(2) Two members who shall each have at least 10 years of experience with, or providing professional services to, a firm or firms engaged, during that period, in
 subcontracting for public works construction in California.

(3) Two members who shall each be a member in good standing of, or have provided professional services to, an organized labor union with at least 10 years of experience in public works construction in California.

(4) Seven members who shall each be experienced in, and knowledgeable of, public works construction under contracts let by public agencies; two each representing cities, counties, respectively, and two members representing school districts, and one member representing a special district. At least one of the two county representatives shall be a county auditor or his or her designee.

(b) The member of the Contractors’ State License Board who is a general engineering contractor as that term is defined in Section 7056 of the Business and Professions
 Code shall serve as an ex officio voting member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 24.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22011.

The Controller, in an effort to select highly qualified commission members, shall solicit from organized representatives of the construction industry and public agencies recommendations for appointments to the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21101 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1054) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

22012.

At least one commission member of the seven representing the construction industry and at least one of the seven representing public agencies shall have previous accounting experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22013.

The commission members shall select a chairperson from among its membership. The chairperson shall serve as chair for a term of two years from the date of selection. In no event shall two consecutive chairpersons be appointees representing either the construction industry or public agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 110, Sec. 1.   (AB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

22014.

(a) The members of the commission shall hold office for terms of three years, and until their successors are appointed.

(b) Members may be reappointed, by the Controller, for subsequent terms of three years.

(c) The Controller may appoint a successor for any commissioner after his or her three-year term expires.

(d) The Controller shall, within 120 days, appoint a replacement to fill any vacancy on the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 25.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22015.

(a) The Controller shall make available for the conduct of the commission’s business, such staff and other support as does not conflict with the accomplishment of the other business of the office of the Controller.

(b) Each member of the commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of the member’s duties. Reimbursement rates shall conform to the Controller’s travel guideline rates. 

(c) The commission may accept grants from federal, state, or local public agencies, or from private foundations or individuals, in order to assist
 it in carrying out its duties, functions, and powers under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 26.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22016.

The commission shall meet not less than once each year, at a time and place chosen by its membership.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21106 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

22017.

The commission shall do all of the following:

(a) After due deliberation and study, recommend for adoption by the Controller, uniform construction cost accounting procedures for implementation by public agencies in the performance of, or in contracting for, construction on public projects. The procedures shall, to the extent deemed feasible and practicable by the commission, incorporate, or be consistent with construction cost accounting procedures and reporting requirements utilized by state and federal agencies on public projects, and be uniformly applicable to all public agencies which elect to utilize the uniform procedures. As part of its deliberations and review, the commission shall take into
 consideration relevant provisions of the Office of Management and Budget Circular A-76, as periodically revised.

(b) After due deliberation and study, recommend for adoption by the Controller cost accounting procedures designed especially for implementation by California cities with a population of less than 75,000. The procedures shall incorporate cost accounting and reporting requirements deemed practicable and applicable to all cities under 75,000 population which elect to utilize the uniform procedures. For purposes of these cost accounting procedures, the following shall apply:

(1) Cities with a population of less than 75,000 shall assume an overhead rate equal to 20 percent of the total costs of a public project, including the costs of material, equipment, and labor.

(2) Cities with a population of more than
 75,000 may either calculate an actual overhead rate or assume an overhead rate equal to 30 percent of the total costs of a public project, including the costs of material, equipment, and labor.

(c) Recommend for adoption by the Controller, procedures and standards for the periodic evaluation and adjustment, as necessary, of the monetary limits specified in Section 22032.

(d) The commission shall make an annual report to the Legislature with respect to its activities and operations, together with those recommendations as it deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 27.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22018.

The Controller shall, upon receipt of the commission’s recommendations, review and evaluate the recommended procedures and either formally adopt or reject the recommended procedures within 90 days of submission by the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21108 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

22019.

Upon determining that the recommended uniform construction cost accounting procedures will serve the best interests of the state and public agencies, and upon formal adoption by the Controller, the Controller shall promulgate the uniform procedure for all public agencies electing to participate, together with instructions for their adoption and implementation by any public agency.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21109 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

22020.

In accordance with procedures and standards adopted pursuant to Section 22017, every five years the commission shall consider whether there have been material changes in public construction costs and make recommendations to the Controller regarding adjustments in the monetary limits prescribed by Section 22032, but in no case shall the amount, as adjusted, be less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). The Controller shall notify all participating public
 agencies of the adjustment prior to the effective date. That notification shall also describe the provisions of this chapter and the benefits of using its provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 169, Sec. 1.   (AB 2249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Public Projects: Alternative Procedure [22030. - 22045.]

22030.

(a) This article applies only to a public agency whose governing board has by resolution elected to become subject to the uniform construction cost accounting procedures set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 22010) and which has notified the Controller of that election. In the event of a conflict with any other provision of law relative to bidding procedures, this article shall apply to any public agency which has adopted a resolution and so notified the Controller.

(b) A county, whether general law or charter, containing a population of less than 500,000 may award individual annual contracts as provided in Section 20128.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 28.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22031.

(a) Prior to January 1, 2013, this article shall not prohibit a board of supervisors or a county road commissioner from utilizing, as an alternative to the procedures set forth in this article, the procedures set forth in Article 25 (commencing with Section 20390) of Chapter 1.

(b) On or after January 1, 2013, this article shall not prohibit a board of supervisors or a county road commissioner from utilizing, as an alternative to the procedures set forth in this article, the procedures set forth in Article 25 (commencing with Section 20390) of Chapter 1 for both of the following:

(1) Maintenance and emergency work.

(2) New road construction and road reconstruction as long as the total value of the new road construction and the road reconstruction performed under the procedures set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 20395 during a fiscal year does not exceed 30 percent of the total value of all work performed by force account other than maintenance as reported in the Controller’s Streets and Roads Annual Report as of March 1 of each year prior to the fiscal year.

(c) The value of force account work necessary to facilitate capital projects for the purpose of contracting to the private sector, including design, engineering, inspection, testing, and other force account work necessary to administer private contracts, shall be excluded from the 30-percent limit in subdivision (b).

(d) The value of force account work necessary to facilitate projects performed by county employees, including design, engineering, inspection, testing, and other force account work necessary to administer work performed under subdivision (b), shall apply to the 30-percent limit in subdivision (b).

(e) On or after January 1, 2013, for a county with a population of less than 50,000, this article shall not prohibit a board of supervisors or a county road commissioner from utilizing, as an alternative to the procedures set forth in this article, the procedures set forth in Article 25 (commencing with Section 20390) of Chapter 1.

(f) The requirements set forth in Section 22038 shall apply to any county subject to this
 section.

(g) Any county board of supervisors or county road commissioner acting pursuant to the authority granted in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall publicly declare its intention to use this authority prior to commencing work. The public declaration may be on a project-by-project basis, via a list of anticipated projects for the fiscal year, or via a list that may be included in the county’s annual budget.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 3.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22032.

(a) Public projects of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) or less may be performed by the employees of a public agency by force account, by negotiated contract, or by purchase order.

(b) Public projects of two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000) or less may be let to contract by informal procedures as set forth in this article.

(c) Public projects of more than two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000) shall, except as otherwise provided in this article, be let to contract by formal bidding procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 2.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22033.

It shall be unlawful to split or separate into smaller work orders or projects any project for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article requiring work to be done by contract after competitive bidding.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21203 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1054) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

22034.

Each public agency that elects to become subject to the uniform construction accounting procedures set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 22010) shall enact an informal bidding ordinance to govern the selection of contractors to perform public projects pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 22032. The ordinance shall include all of the following:

(a) Notice to contractors shall be provided in accordance with either paragraph (1) or (2), or both.

(1) The public agency shall maintain a list of qualified contractors, identified according to categories of work. Minimum criteria for development and maintenance of the contractors list shall be determined by the commission. All contractors on the list for the category of
 work being bid shall be mailed, faxed, or emailed a notice inviting informal bids unless the product or service is proprietary. All mailing of notices to contractors pursuant to this subdivision shall be completed not less than 10 calendar days before bids are due.

(2) The public agency may elect to mail, fax, or email a notice inviting informal bids to all construction trade journals specified in Section 22036.

(b) The notice inviting informal bids shall describe the project in general terms and how to obtain more detailed information about the project, and state the time and place for the submission of bids.

(c) The governing body of the public agency may delegate the authority to award informal contracts to the public works director, general manager, purchasing agent, or other appropriate person.

(d) If all bids received are in excess of two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000), the governing body of the public agency may, by adoption of a resolution by a four-fifths vote, award the contract, at two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000) or less, to the lowest responsible bidder, if it determines the cost estimate of the public agency was reasonable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 3.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22035.

(a) In cases of emergency when repair or replacements are necessary, the governing body may proceed at once to replace or repair any public facility without adopting plans, specifications, strain sheets, or working details, or giving notice for bids to let contracts. The work may be done by day labor under the direction of the governing body, by contractor, or by a combination of the two.

(b) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the public agency shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

22035.5.

In counties that are under court order to relieve justice facility overcrowding, the procedures and restrictions specified in Section 20134 shall apply to all contracts issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 993, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22036.

The commission shall determine, on a county-by-county basis, the appropriate construction trade journals which shall receive mailed, faxed, or emailed notice of all informal and formal construction contracts being bid for work within the specified county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 30.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22037.

Notice inviting formal bids shall state the time and place for the receiving and opening of sealed bids and distinctly describe the project. The notice shall be published at least 14 calendar days before the date of opening the bids in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the jurisdiction of the public agency; or, if there is no newspaper printed and published within the jurisdiction of the public agency, in a newspaper of general circulation which is circulated within the jurisdiction of the public agency, or, if there is no newspaper which is circulated within the jurisdiction of the public agency, publication shall be by posting the notice in at least three places within the jurisdiction of the public agency as have been designated by
 ordinance or regulation of the public agency as places for the posting of its notices. The notice inviting formal bids shall also be sent electronically, if available, by either facsimile or electronic mail and mailed to all construction trade journals specified in Section 22036. The notice shall be sent at least 15 calendar days before the date of opening the bids. In addition to notice required by this section, the public agency may give such other notice as it deems proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   (AB 2184)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22038.

(a) In its discretion, the public agency may reject any bids presented, if the agency, prior to rejecting all bids and declaring that the project can be more economically performed by employees of the agency, furnishes a written notice to an apparent low bidder. The notice shall inform the bidder of the agency’s intention to reject the bid and shall be mailed at least two business days prior to the hearing at which the agency intends to reject the bid. If after the first invitation of bids all bids are rejected, after reevaluating its cost estimates of the project, the public agency shall have the option of either of the following:

(1) Abandoning the project or readvertising for bids in the manner described by this article.

(2) By passage of a resolution by a four-fifths vote of its governing body declaring that the project can be performed more economically by the employees of the public agency, may have the project done by force account without further complying with this article.

(b) If a contract is awarded, it shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the public agency may accept the one it chooses.

(c) If no bids are received through the formal or informal procedure, the project may be performed by the employees of the public agency by force account, or negotiated contract without further complying with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22039.

The governing body of the participating public agency or its designated representative shall adopt plans, specifications, and working details for all public projects exceeding the amount specified in subdivision (c) of Section 22032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 4.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22040.

Any person may examine the plans, specifications, or working details, or all of these, adopted by the public agency for any project.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21210 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1054) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

22041.

This article does not apply to the construction of any public building used for facilities of juvenile forestry camps or juvenile homes, ranches, or camps established under Article 15 (commencing with Section 880) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if a major portion of the construction work is to be performed by wards of the juvenile court assigned to those camps, ranches, or homes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21211 (as added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1054) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

22042.

The commission shall review the accounting procedures of any participating public agency where an interested party presents evidence that the work undertaken by the public agency falls within any of the following categories:

(a) Is to be performed by a public agency after rejection of all bids, claiming work can be done less expensively by the public agency.

(b) Exceeded the force account limits set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 22032.

(c) Has been improperly classified as maintenance.

(d) Has been split or separated into smaller work orders or
 projects, in violation of Section 22033.

(e) Has exceeded the limits or otherwise not met the requirements set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 22032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 5.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22042.5.

The commission shall review practices of any participating public agency where an interested party presents evidence that the public agency is not in compliance with Section 22034 or 22037.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 6.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22043.

(a) In those circumstances set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 22042, a request for commission review shall be in writing, sent by certified or registered mail received by the commission postmarked not later than eight business days from the date the public agency has rejected all bids.

(b) In those circumstances set forth in subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 22042, a request for commission review shall be by letter received by the commission not later than eight days from the date an interested party formally complains to the public agency.

(c) The commission review shall commence immediately and conclude within the following number of days from the receipt of the request for commission
 review:

(1) Forty-five days for a review that falls within subdivision (a) of Section 22042.

(2) Ninety days for a review that falls within subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 22042.

(d) During the review of a project that falls within subdivision (a) of Section 22042, the agency shall not proceed on the project until a final decision is received by the commission.

(e) A request for commission review pursuant to Section 22042.5 shall be in writing, sent by certified or registered mail, and received by the commission no later than eight days from the day an interested party formally complains to the public agency. The commission review shall commence immediately and conclude within 90 days from the receipt of the request for commission
 review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 7.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22044.

The commission shall prepare written findings, which shall be presented to the public agency within 30 calendar days of formal commission review. Should the commission find that the provisions of this chapter or of the uniform cost accounting procedures provided for in this chapter were not complied with by the public agency, the following steps shall be implemented by that agency:

(a) On those projects set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 22042, the public agency has the option of either (1) abandoning the project, or (2) awarding the project to the lowest responsible bidder.

(b) On those projects set forth in subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 22042, the public agency shall present the commission’s findings
 to its governing body within 30 calendar days of receipt of written notice of the findings and that governing body shall conduct a public hearing with regard to the commission’s findings within 60 calendar days of receipt of the findings.

(c) (1) On findings of noncompliance pursuant to Section 22042.5, the public agency shall notify its governing body of the commission’s findings within 60 calendar days of receipt of written notice of the findings from the commission.

(2) The public agency shall notify the commission in writing, within 90 days of receipt of written notice of the findings, of the public agency’s best efforts to comply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 953, Sec. 8.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22044.5.

If the commission makes a finding, in accordance with Section 22043, on three separate occasions within a 10-year period, that the work undertaken by a public agency falls within any of the categories described in Section 22042, the commission shall notify the public agency of that finding in writing by certified mail and the public agency shall not use the bidding procedures provided by this article for five years from the date of the commission’s findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 192, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22045.

(a) No later than January 1, 1985, the commission shall recommend, for adoption by the Controller, written procedures implementing the accounting procedures review provided for in this article.

(b) The Controller shall, upon receipt of the commission’s recommendation, review and evaluate the recommended procedures and either formally adopt or reject the recommended procedures within 90 days of submission of the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21215 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1019, Sec. 67.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Emergency Contracting Procedures [22050. - 22050.]

22050.

(a) (1) In the case of an emergency, a public agency, pursuant to a four-fifths vote of its governing body, may repair or replace a public facility, take any directly related and immediate action required by that emergency, and procure the necessary equipment, services, and supplies for those purposes, without giving notice for bids to let contracts.

(2) Before a governing body takes any action pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall make a finding, based on substantial evidence set forth in the minutes of its meeting, that the emergency will not permit a delay resulting from a competitive solicitation for bids, and that the action is necessary to respond to the
 emergency.

(b) (1) The governing body, by a four-fifths vote, may delegate, by resolution or ordinance, to the appropriate county administrative officer, city manager, chief engineer, or other nonelected agency officer, the authority to order any action pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) If the public agency has no county administrative officer, city manager, chief engineer, or other nonelected agency officer, the governing body, by a four-fifths vote, may delegate to an elected officer the authority to order any action specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) If a person with authority delegated pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) orders any action specified in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (a), that person shall report to the governing body, at its next meeting required pursuant to this section, the reasons justifying why the emergency will not permit a delay resulting from a competitive solicitation for bids and why the action is necessary to respond to the emergency.

(c) (1) If the governing body orders any action specified in subdivision (a), the governing body shall review the emergency action at its next regularly scheduled meeting and, except as specified below, at every regularly scheduled meeting thereafter until the action is terminated, to determine, by a four-fifths vote, that there is a need to continue the action. If the governing body meets weekly, it may review the emergency action in accordance with this paragraph every 14 days.

(2) If a person with authority delegated pursuant to subdivision (b) orders any action specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the governing body shall initially review the emergency action not later than 7 days after the action, or at its next regularly scheduled meeting if that meeting will occur not later than 14 days after the action, and at least at every regularly scheduled meeting thereafter until the action is terminated, to determine, by a four-fifths vote, that there is a need to continue the action, unless a person with authority delegated pursuant to subdivision (b) has terminated that action prior to the governing body reviewing the emergency action and making a determination pursuant to this subdivision. If the governing body meets weekly, it may, after the initial review, review the emergency action in accordance with this paragraph every 14 days.

(3) When the governing body reviews the emergency action pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2), it shall terminate the action at the earliest possible date that conditions warrant so that the remainder of the emergency action may be completed by giving notice for bids to let contracts.

(d) As used in this section, “public agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22002.

(e) A three-member governing body may take actions pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) by a two-thirds vote.

(f) This section applies only to emergency action taken pursuant to Sections 20134, 20168, 20205.1, 20213, 20223, 20233, 20253, 20273, 20283, 20293, 20303, 20313, 20321, 20331,
 20567, 20586, 20604, 20635, 20645, 20682, 20682.5, 20736, 20751.1, 20806, 20812, 20914, 20918, 20926, 20931, 20941, 20961, 20991, 21020.2, 21024, 21031, 21043, 21061, 21072, 21081, 21091, 21101, 21111, 21121, 21131, 21141, 21151, 21161, 21171, 21181, 21191, 21196, 21203, 21212, 21221, 21231, 21241, 21251, 21261, 21271, 21290, 21311, 21321, 21331, 21341, 21351, 21361, 21371, 21381, 21391, 21401, 21411, 21421, 21431, 21441, 21451, 21461, 21472, 21482, 21491, 21501, 21511, 21521, 21531, 21541, 21552, 21567, 21572, 21581, 21591, 21601, 21618, 21624, 21631, 21641, and 22035.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 111, Sec. 2.   (AB 2634)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Acquisition of Electronic Data Processing [22101. - 22109.]

22101.
